District of Columbia statutes.
7-1632

Senior HIV/AIDS Education and Outreach Program establishment.

There is established within the Department the Senior HIV/AIDS Education and Outreach Program, which shall train seniors to provide information to other seniors on how to prevent the transmission of HIV and to engage in education and outreach on issues related to HIV and AIDS with community-based providers that serve seniors in the District.

History

July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-152, § 3, 59 DCR 5136

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1631.